Utah statutes.
70A-9a-625.   Remedies for secured party's failure to comply with chapter.
(1)  If it is established that a secured party is not proceeding in accordance
with this chapter, a court may order or restrain collection, enforcement, or
disposition of collateral on appropriate terms and conditions.
(2)  Subject to Subsections (3), (4), and (5), a person is liable for damages
in the amount of any loss caused by a failure to comply with this chapter.
Loss caused by a failure to comply may include loss resulting from the
debtor's inability to obtain, or increased costs of, alternative financing.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-9a-628:
(a)  a person that, at the time of the failure, was a debtor, was an obligor,
or held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral may recover
damages under Subsection (2) for its loss; and
(b)  if the collateral is consumer goods, a person that was a debtor or a
secondary obligor at the time a secured party failed to comply with this part
may recover for that failure in any event an amount not less than the credit
service charge plus 10% of the principal amount of the obligation or the time-
price differential plus 10% of the cash price.
(4)  A debtor whose deficiency is eliminated under Section 70A-9a-626 may
recover damages for the loss of any surplus.  However, a debtor or secondary
obligor whose deficiency is eliminated or reduced under Section 70A-9a-626 may
not otherwise recover under Subsection (2) for noncompliance with the
provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or
acceptance.
(5)  In addition to any damages recoverable under Subsection (2), the debtor,
consumer obligor, or person named as a debtor in a filed record, as
applicable, may recover $500 in each case from a person that:
(a)  fails to comply with Section 70A-9a-208;
(b)  fails to comply with Section 70A-9a-209;
(c)  files a record that the person is not entitled to file under Subsection
70A-9a-509(1);
(d)  fails to cause the secured party of record to file or send a termination
statement as required by Subsection 70A-9a-513(1) or (3);
(e)  fails to comply with Subsection 70A-9a-616(2)(a) and whose failure is
part of a pattern, or consistent with a practice, of noncompliance; or
(f)  fails to comply with Subsection 70A-9a-616(2)(b).
(6)  A debtor or consumer obligor may recover damages under Subsection (2)
and, in addition, $500 in each case from a person that, without reasonable
cause, fails to comply with a request under Section 70A-9a-210.  A recipient
of a request under Section 70A-9a-210 which never claimed an interest in the
collateral or obligations that are the subject of a request under that section
has a reasonable excuse for failure to comply with the request within the
meaning of this Subsection (6).
(7)  If a secured party fails to comply with a request regarding a list of
collateral or a statement of account under Section 70A-9a-210, the secured
party may claim a security interest only as shown in the list or statement
included in the request as against a person that is reasonably misled by the
failure.
